Maryland, session 2026, HB0733.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
7–720.
THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL PROVIDE REAL–TIME AUDIBLE AND
TEXT–BASED ANNOUNCEMENTS THAT ANNOUNCE ALL STOPS AND OTHER CRITICAL
INFORMATION ON ALL FIXED–ROUTE TRANSIT SERVICES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0733*